Alabama, session 2026rs, HB479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
11 Section 1. (a) Beginning October 1, 2026, in lieu of
12 any other fees, compensation, or expense allowances, the Judge
13 of Probate of Coosa County shall receive an annual salary
14 equal to 70 percent of the salary paid to a district court
15 judge with equivalent years of service, including any
16 increases in salary due to years of service or cost-of-living
17 adjustments.
18 (b) The salary of the judge of probate shall be
19 increased any time and in the same manner as the salary of a
20 district court judge having the same number of cumulative
21 years of service.
22 (c) The salary provided by this section shall be in
23 lieu of any and all other prior compensation or salary
24 provided by law to the judge of probate, and shall be paid in
25 equal periodic installments from the county general fund.
26 (d) In order to receive the compensation provided in
27 this section, the judge of probate shall waive any
28 compensation provided under Section 17-3-60, Code of Alabama
Page 1

compensation provided under Section 17-3-60, Code of Alabama
HB479 Enrolled
29 1975, relating to reports from the state voter registration
30 list.
31 (e) In addition to salary, the county shall provide the
32 same insurance and other benefits as received by any other
33 employee of the county.
34 (f) The judge of probate shall be entitled to
35 reimbursement of expenses related to travel, training, and
36 other official job-related functions in the same manner and to
37 the same extent as other employees of the county.
38 Section 2. (a) The Sheriff of Coosa County shall
39 continue to receive the annual salary the sheriff is receiving
40 on the effective date of this act for the remainder of the
41 term of office that commenced on January 16, 2023.
42 (b)(1) Beginning on October 1, 2026, in addition to the
43 salary provided in subsection (a), the sheriff shall be
44 entitled to an expense allowance so that the annual salary and
45 expense allowance of the sheriff is equal to 60 percent of the
46 salary paid to a district court judge with equivalent years of
47 service, including any increases in salary due to years of
48 service or cost-of-living adjustments.
49 (2) The expense allowance shall be payable in equal
50 monthly installments from the general fund of the county.
51 (3) The expense allowance shall be in addition to all
52 other compensation or benefits provided to the sheriff and
53 shall be treated the same as salary for retirement purposes.
54 (c)(1) Beginning January 18, 2027, in lieu of any other
55 fees, compensation, or expense allowances, the Sheriff of
56 Coosa County shall receive an annual salary equal to 60
Page 2

Coosa County shall receive an annual salary equal to 60
HB479 Enrolled
57 percent of the salary paid to a district court judge with
58 equivalent years of service, including any increases in salary
59 due to years of service or cost-of-living adjustments, and the
60 expense allowance provided in subsection (b) shall be void.
61 (2) The salary of the sheriff shall be increased any
62 time and in the same manner as the salary of a district court
63 judge having the same number of cumulative years of service.
64 The sheriff shall not be eligible for any county-provided
65 employee cost-of-living or salary increases.
66 (3) The salary provided by this section shall be in
67 lieu of all prior compensation or salary provided by law to
68 the sheriff, and shall be paid in equal periodic installments
69 from the county general fund.
70 (4) The sheriff shall be entitled to reimbursement of
71 expenses related to travel, training, and other official
72 job-related functions in the same manner and to the same
73 extent as other employees of the county.
74 (5) In addition to salary, the county shall provide the
75 same insurance and other benefits as received by any other
76 employee of the county.
77 (6) If the implementation of any cost-of-living
78 adjustment applicable to district court judges increases the
79 salary of the incumbent sheriff, the increase shall be paid as
80 an expense allowance until the beginning of the next term of
81 office, when the amount of the expense allowance shall be
82 included in the base salary of the sheriff and the expense
83 account shall then be voided.
84 Section 3. (a) The Revenue Commissioner of Coosa County
Page 3

Section 3. (a) The Revenue Commissioner of Coosa County
HB479 Enrolled
85 shall continue to receive the annual salary the revenue
86 commissioner is receiving on the effective date of this act
87 for the remainder of the current term of office which
88 commenced on October 1, 2023.
89 (b)(1) Beginning on October 1, 2026, in addition to the
90 salary provided in subsection (a), the revenue commissioner
91 shall be entitled to an expense allowance so that the annual
92 salary and expense allowance of the revenue commissioner is
93 equal to 60 percent of the salary paid to a district court
94 judge with equivalent years of service, including any
95 increases in salary due to years of service or cost-of-living
96 adjustments.
97 (2) The expense allowance shall be payable in equal
98 monthly installments from the general fund of the county.
99 (3) The expense allowance shall be in addition to all
100 other compensation or benefits provided to the revenue
101 commissioner and shall be treated the same as salary for
102 retirement purposes.
103 (c)(1) Beginning October 1, 2027, in lieu of any other
104 fees, compensation, or expense allowances, the Revenue
105 Commissioner of Coosa County shall receive an annual salary
106 equal to 60 percent of the salary paid to a district court
107 judge with equivalent years of service, including any
108 increases in salary due to years of service or cost-of-living
109 adjustments, and the expense allowance provided in subsection
110 (b) shall be void.
111 (2) The salary of the revenue commissioner shall be
112 increased any time and in the same manner as the salary of a
Page 4

increased any time and in the same manner as the salary of a
HB479 Enrolled
113 district court judge having the same number of cumulative
114 years of service. The revenue commissioner shall not be
115 eligible for any county-provided employee cost-of-living or
116 salary increases.
117 (3) The salary provided by this section shall be in
118 lieu of all prior compensation or salary provided by law to
119 the revenue commissioner, and shall be paid in equal periodic
120 installments from the county general fund.
121 (4) The revenue commissioner shall be entitled to
122 reimbursement of expenses related to travel, training, and
123 other official job-related functions in the same manner and to
124 the same extent as other employees of the county.
125 (5) In addition to salary, the county shall provide the
126 same insurance and other benefits as received by any other
127 employee of the county.
128 (6) If the implementation of any cost-of-living
129 adjustment applicable to district court judges increases the
130 salary of the incumbent revenue commissioner, the increase
131 shall be paid as an expense allowance until the beginning of
132 the next term of office, when the amount of the expense
133 allowance shall be included in the base salary of the revenue
134 commissioner and the expense account shall then be voided.
135 Section 4. Section 45-19-11, Code of Alabama 1975,
136 providing for compensation for the Coosa County Judge of
137 Probate, Sheriff, and Revenue Commissioner, is repealed.
138 Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
139 1, 2026.
Page 5

1, 2026.
HB479 Enrolled
140
141
142
143
144
145
146
147
148
149
150 ________________________________________________
151 Speaker of the House of Representatives
152
153
154
155 ________________________________________________
156 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
157
158
159 House of Representatives
160
161 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
162 was passed by the House 25-Feb-26.
163
164 John Treadwell
165 Clerk
166
167
168
169
170
171 Senate 03-Mar-26 Passed
172
173
174
Page 6